Utah statutes.
73-3a-103.   Water exports governed by this chapter.

This chapter governs application procedures and criteria for the approval of applications for:

(1)  the appropriation of water from sources within the state of Utah for use outside the state; and

(2)  permanent or temporary changes of point of diversion, place of use, or purpose of use of water that is:

(a)  appropriated from sources within the state of Utah; and

(b)  used, or proposed to be used, outside the state.



Enacted by Chapter 234, 1991 General Session

